Massachusetts, session 194th, H761.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Subsection (c ) of section 35TTT of chapter 10 of the general laws, as most
recently amended by chapter 197 of the acts of 2024, is hereby further amended at the end
thereof the following:
“Members of said advisory committee, who are not state employees, shall be deemed
“special state employees,” pursuant to the provisions of chapter 268a of the general laws as
appearing in the 2020 Official Edition.”
SECTION 2. Said subsection (e) of said section 35TTT of chapter 10, as amended by
chapter 197 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by inserting after the word, “facilities,” the
following words, “provided, however, that eligibility for any such no interest or forgivable
capital loan shall be limited to not-for-profit entities; and by inserting in the same subsection,
after the words “regional entities, the following: “ and (D) for the construction of free-standing
of 2

small house nursing homes serving less than fourteen residents, and operated in collaboration
with home and community-based supports and services.”
of 2